Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
HAWAII OCCUPATIONAL EMPLOYMENT PLANNING SYSTEM

§373C-41 Powers and duties. The Hawaii
occupational employment planning system shall be part of the Hawaii
occupational information system. It shall develop and deliver occupational
employment demand and supply information used for planning purposes by
employment, training, vocational education, vocational rehabilitation, economic
development, and other agencies as well as private industry and individuals.
The system shall be based on standardized and nonduplicative techniques and
processes to the maximum extent practicable. [L 1983, c 193, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next